Utah statutes.
25-5-2.   Wills and implied trusts excepted.

Section 25-5-1 may not be construed to affect the power of a testator in the disposition of the testator's real estate by last will and testament; nor to prevent any trust from arising or being extinguished by implication or operation of law.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

